Washington statutes.
RCW 14.08.010

Definition—"Municipality."

(1) For the purpose of this chapter, unless herein specifically otherwise provided, the definitions of words, terms and phrases appearing in the state aeronautic department act of this state are hereby adopted.

(2) As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires: "Municipality" means any county, city, town, airport district, or port district of this state; "airport purposes" means and includes airport, restricted landing area and other air navigation facility purposes.

[ 1987 c 254 s 3; 1945 c 182 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 2722-30.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: The state aeronautic department act (chapter 252, Laws of 1945) contained no definitions. It was repealed by chapter 165, Laws of 1947, codified herein as chapter 47.68 RCW.